Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-505
Burning to defraud insurer; penalty.

Any person who, with the intent to deceive or harm an insurer, sets fire to or burns or attempts so to do, or who causes to be burned, or who aids, counsels or procures the burning of any building or personal property, of whatsoever class or character, whether the property of himself or of another, which shall at the time be insured by any person, company or corporation against loss or damage by fire, commits a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 104.